Louisiana, session 2026, SB296.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:601(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§601. Wildlife and Fisheries Commission
A. The control and supervision of the wildlife of the state, including all
aquatic life, is vested in the Louisiana Wildlife and Fisheries Commission. The
commission shall be in the executive branch and shall consist of seven nine members
appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. Six members shall
serve for overlapping terms of six years, and one member three members shall serve
for a term concurrent with that of the governor. Three members shall be electors of
the coastal parishes and representatives of the commercial fishing and fur industries,
and four six shall be electors from the state at large other than representatives of the
commercial fishing and fur industries as provided by law. No member who has
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-624 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 296
served six years or more shall be eligible for reappointment.
Section 2. R.S. 56:1(B) and (C) hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1. Wildlife and Fisheries Commission established; membership; qualifications;
definitions
* * *
B. The commission shall consist of seven nine members appointed by the
governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. Six of the members shall each serve
for overlapping terms of six years, and one three shall serve for a term concurrent
with that of the governor.
C. Three members of the commission shall be electors of the coastal parishes
and representatives of the commercial fishing and fur industries. The other four six
shall be electors from the state at large, other than representatives of the commercial
fishing and fur industries.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article IX, Section 7 of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as Senate Bill No. 249 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at the statewide election to be held on November 3, 2026, and becomes effective.